Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 48. Influenza Vaccine Price Gouging.

The number of this chapter
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2005 act having been 47.

§ 59.1-533.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Influenza vaccine” means a vaccine, intended to be administered by injection, that contains inactivated influenza viruses, that is prepared for the applicable influenza season.

“Influenza vaccine shortage period” means the period of time during which a proclamation of the Governor provides that an influenza vaccine shortage exists.

History.
2005, c. 861.

The numbers for the sections
contained in this chapter, §§ 59.1-533 through 59.1-537, were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2005 act having been §§ 59.1-530 through 59.1-534.

§ 59.1-534.
Proclamation of influenza vaccine shortage.

In the event of an existing or threatened influenza vaccine shortage due to an abnormal market disruption or other extraordinary adverse circumstance, the Governor may issue an executive order proclaiming that an influenza vaccine shortage exists. Prior
to issuing such a proclamation, the Governor shall consult with the State Health Commissioner. An executive order proclaiming that an influenza vaccine shortage exists shall not be issued unless the Governor determines that:

The amount of influenza vaccine available for administration in the Commonwealth is not reasonably sufficient to provide influenza vaccinations to those persons residing in the Commonwealth who are in primary target groups recommended for annual influenza
vaccination in accordance with the most recently available recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Department of Health and Human Services’ Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
and

Price gouging with respect to influenza vaccine is occurring or is likely to occur as the proximate result of the influenza vaccine shortage.

History.
2005, c. 861.

§ 59.1-535.
Prohibitions.

During any influenza vaccine shortage period, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell or administer, or to offer to sell or administer, influenza vaccine at an unconscionable price within the Commonwealth. Actual sales at the increased price shall
not be required for the increase to be considered unconscionable. In determining whether the price at which influenza vaccine is sold or administered is unconscionable, the following shall be considered:

Whether the price charged by the person for selling or administering the influenza vaccine grossly exceeded the price charged by the person therefor during the 10 days immediately prior to the commencement of the influenza vaccine shortage period; however,
with respect to any person who was offering influenza vaccine at a reduced price immediately prior to the commencement of the influenza vaccine shortage period, the price at which the person usually offers influenza vaccine shall
be used as the benchmark for these purposes;

Whether the price charged by the person grossly exceeded the price at which influenza vaccine was readily obtainable by consumers in the trade area during the 10 days immediately prior to the commencement of the influenza vaccine shortage period; and

Whether the increase in the amount charged by the person was attributable solely to additional costs incurred by the person in connection with the sale of the influenza vaccine, including additional costs imposed by the person’s source. Proof that the
person incurred such additional costs during the time of the influenza vaccine shortage period shall be prima facie evidence that the price increase was not unconscionable.

History.
2005, c. 861.

§ 59.1-536.
Complaint investigations.

In the event that the Attorney General, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any county, city, or town investigates a complaint for a violation of § 59.1-535 and determines that the person has not violated the section, and if the person
requests, the Attorney General, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any county, city, or town shall promptly issue a signed statement indicating that a violation of § 59.1-535 has not been found. Subject to the disclosures
allowed by this section, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any county, city, or town, or their designees, that investigates any complaint for violation of § 59.1-535
to maintain the confidentiality of all evidence, testimony, documents, or other results of such investigations, including the names of the complainant, and the person that is the subject of the investigation. Nothing herein contained
shall be construed to prevent the presentation and disclosure of any such investigative evidence in an action or proceeding brought under this chapter.

History.
2005, c. 861.

§ 59.1-537.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice under the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of Chapter 17 (§ 59.1-196 et seq.) of this title except that, § 59.1-204 notwithstanding,
nothing in this chapter shall create a private cause of action in favor of any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter.

History.
2005, c. 861.